Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1435
Remedy for termination.

If the rental agreement is terminated, the landlord is entitled to possession and may have a claim for rent and a separate claim for actual damages for breach of the rental agreement and reasonable attorney's fees as provided in subsection (3) of section 76-1431.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 35.